West Virginia, session 2025, HB2468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Repeal of article creating the Department of Economic Development. That §5B-2-1, §5B-2-2, §5B-2-3, §5B-2-3b, §5B-2-4, §5B-2-4a, §5B-2-5, §5B-2-6, §5B-2-6a, §5B-2-9a, §5B-2-10, §5B-2-14, §5B-2-15, §5B-2-16, §5B-2-17, §5B-2-18, §5B-2-18a, §5B-2-19, §5B-2-20, and §5B-2-21 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended are repealed.